Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8706
Nonidentifiable information, defined.

Nonidentifiable information means information presented in a form and manner that prevents the identification of any provider, patient, or reporter of patient safety work product. With respect to patients, such information must be de-identified consistent with the regulations promulgated pursuant to section 264(c) of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, as such regulations existed on April 28, 2005.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 6.